Rhode Island, session 2025, SB888.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-77.4-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-77.4 entitled "Mayoral
Academies [See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby
amended to read as follows:
16-77.4-1. Entities eligible to apply to become, or for the expansion of, a mayoral
academy.
(a) A “mayoral academy” means a charter school created by a mayor of any city or town
within the State of Rhode Island, acting by, or through, a nonprofit organization established for
said purpose (regardless of the time said nonprofit organization is in existence), that enrolls students
from more than one city or town, including both urban and non-urban communities, and that offers
an equal number of enrollments to students on a lottery basis; provided, further, that such mayoral
academies shall have a board of trustees or directors that is comprised of representatives from each
included city or town and is chaired by a mayor of an included city or town. Provided further, that
the only voting members of the board of trustees or directors of a mayoral academy shall be the
mayor or, if there is no mayor, the town administrator, from each included city or town. The boards
of trustees or directors may have other nonvoting members, from each included city or town, who
shall serve in an advisory capacity. The mayor from each city or town, or in the absence of a mayor,
the city or town council via a resolution or ordinance, shall approve the participation in the mayoral
academy’s catchment area for a proposed charter or an amendment to a charter for expansion. For
purposes of this chapter, the term “mayor” shall include any elected town administrator.

(b) No child shall be required to attend a mayoral academy, nor shall any teacher be
required to teach in a mayoral academy. The school committee of the district in which a mayoral
academy is located shall make accommodations to facilitate the transfer of students who do not
wish to participate in a mayoral academy into other public schools. It shall also make
accommodations for those students who wish to transfer into the mayoral academy as space
permits. If the total number of students who are eligible to attend and apply to a mayoral academy
is greater than the number of spaces available, the mayoral academy shall conduct a lottery to
determine which students shall be admitted.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002562
========
LC002562 - Page 2 of 3